Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB788.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 311 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a physician who is licensed in Kentucky
and meets the qualifications to prescribe, dispense, or administer Buprenorphine-
Mono-Product or Buprenorphine-Combined-with-Naloxone shall use
professional judgement to prescribe, dispense, or administer a specific dosage
regimen of Buprenorphine-Mono-Product or Buprenorphine-Combined-with-
Naloxone that best meets the treatment needs of a patient.
(2) The Kentucky Board of Medical Licensure shall not suspend, limit, or restrict a
license or take other disciplinary action against a physician who prescribes,
dispenses, or administers Buprenorphine-Mono-Product or Buprenorphine-
Combined-with-Naloxone to a patient in accordance with subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) The board shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to implement the requirements of this section.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 314 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, an advanced practice registered nurse
who is licensed in Kentucky and meets the qualifications to prescribe, dispense,
or administer Buprenorphine-Mono-Product or Buprenorphine-Combined-with-
Naloxone shall use professional judgement to prescribe, dispense, or administer a
specific dosage regimen of Buprenorphine-Mono-Product or Buprenorphine-
Combined-with-Naloxone that best meets the treatment needs of a patient.
(2) The board shall not suspend, limit, or restrict a license or take other disciplinary
action against an advanced practice registered nurse who prescribes, dispenses,
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:52 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 951
or administers Buprenorphine-Mono-Product or Buprenorphine-Combined-with-
Naloxone to a patient in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The board shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to implement the requirements of this section.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/19/2025 9:52 AM Jacketed